Utah statutes.
58-1-305.   Inactive license.
(1)  The division may adopt rules permitting inactive licensure. The rules
shall specify the requirements and procedures for placing a license on
inactive status, the length of time a license may remain on inactive status,
and the requirements and procedures to activate an inactive license.
(2)  Except as otherwise specified by rule, an inactive licensee has no right
or privilege to engage in the practice of the licensed occupation or
profession.
